Utah statutes.
77-24-3.   Receipt from owner of returned property.
Whenever property is returned to the owner, a receipt shall be taken from him
listing in detail the property returned. The receipt shall be retained as a
permanent record in the files of the agency involved or the court where the
case is finally resolved.
